Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1412XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1412XD (3) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 43.37, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
43.37 Number of votes permitted per office —— prohibited
methods.
1. The elector shall be permitted to vote for no more
candidates for any office than there are persons to be elected
to the office. If an elector votes for more persons for any
office than the number permitted, the elector’s ballot shall
not be counted for that office.
2. a. An election in this state shall not be conducted
using ranked choice voting or instant runoff voting, including
an election for any statewide, local government, or other
office.
b. For purposes of this subsection:
(1) “Local government” means an incorporated city or town,
an unincorporated city or town, a county, a school, or any
other political subdivision of the state.
(2) “Ranked choice voting” or “instant runoff voting” means
a method of casting and tabulating votes in which a voter
ranks candidates in order of preference, tabulation of ballots
proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate
is elected or the candidate receiving the fewest votes is
defeated, votes are transferred from elected or defeated
candidates to a voter’s next-ranked candidate in order of
preference, and tabulation ends when a candidate receives the
majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected
equals the number of offices to be filled, as applicable.
Sec. 2. Section 49.93, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
49.93 Number of votes for each office —— prohibited methods.
1. For an office to which one person is to be elected, a
voter shall not vote for more than one candidate. If two or
more persons are to be elected to an office, the voter shall
vote for no more than the number of persons to be elected. If a
person votes for more than the permitted number of candidates,
LSB 1412XD (3) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/2

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the vote for that office shall not count. Valid votes cast on
the rest of the ballot shall be counted.
2. a. An election in this state shall not be conducted
using ranked choice voting or instant runoff voting, including
an election for any statewide, local government, or other
office.
b. For purposes of this subsection:
(1) “Local government” means an incorporated city or town,
an unincorporated city or town, a county, a school, or any
other political subdivision of the state.
(2) “Ranked choice voting” or “instant runoff voting” means
a method of casting and tabulating votes in which a voter
ranks candidates in order of preference, tabulation of ballots
proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate
is elected or the candidate receiving the fewest votes is
defeated, votes are transferred from elected or defeated
candidates to a voter’s next-ranked candidate in order of
preference, and tabulation ends when a candidate receives the
majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected
equals the number of offices to be filled, as applicable.